Washington statutes.
RCW 11.56.010

Authority to sell, lease or mortgage.

The court may order real or personal property sold, leased or mortgaged for the purposes hereinafter mentioned but no sale, lease or mortgage of any property of an estate shall be made except under an order of the court, unless otherwise provided by law.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.56.010. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 122; RRS s 1492; prior: 1895 c 157 s 1; 1883 p 29 s 1; Code 1881 s 1486; 1854 p 284 s 97.]